Louisiana, session 2026, HB523.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 15:574.4(L) is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§574.4. Parole; eligibility; juvenile offenders
* * *
L.(1) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary and except as
provided in R.S. 15:574.22, any person serving a sentence of life imprisonment for
a conviction of second degree murder (R.S. 14:30.1) shall be eligible for parole
consideration pursuant to the provisions of this Subsection if all of the following
conditions have been met:
(a) The person was at least seventeen years of age and under the age of
twenty-five years at the time of the commission of the offense.
(b) The person's conviction for a violation of R.S. 14:30.1 is his first and
only felony conviction.
(c) The person has served at least thirty years of the sentence imposed.
(2) The provisions of this Subsection shall not apply to any of the following
individuals:
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-962 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 523
(a) A person serving a sentence of life imprisonment for a conviction of R.S.
14:30.
(b) A person convicted of a sex offense as defined in R.S. 15:541.
(c) A person convicted of any criminal offense that involves a victim who
is under the age of thirteen.
Section 2. This Act shall be known as and may be cited as the "Hope For
Redemption Act".